Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-331
Gross vehicle weight rating, defined.

Gross vehicle weight rating means the value specified by the manufacturer as the loaded weight of a single motor vehicle or trailer.

Laws 2005, LB 274, § 31.